Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-478
Captive wildlife auction permit; issuance; fee; prohibited acts.

(1) To conduct an auction in this state of captive wild birds, captive wild mammals, or captive wildlife as specified in subsection (1) of section 37-477, a person shall apply to the commission on a form prescribed by the commission for a captive wildlife auction permit. An applicant for a permit shall specify the dates of the auction and shall apply for a permit for each auction to be held in the state. The application for the permit shall include the applicant's social security number. The fee for such permit shall be not more than sixty-five dollars, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations specifying application requirements and procedures, reporting and inspection requirements, and other requirements related to auction activities.

(2) A permitholder shall not (a) take wild birds, wild mammals, or other wildlife from the wild in Nebraska or (b) purchase wild birds, wild mammals, or other wildlife from any person other than the commission or a person authorized to propagate and dispose of wild birds, wild mammals, or other wildlife. A permit under this section is not required for an auction of domesticated cervine animals as defined in section 54-2914.

Laws 1957, c. 151, § 2, p. 490;

Laws 1981, LB 72, § 20;

Laws 1986, LB 558, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-714;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 188;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 57;

Laws 2008, LB1162, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB344, § 59.